Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 1 General Provisions
66-11-124. Waiver of lien — Payment bonds.

The acceptance by the lienor of a note or notes for all or any part of the amount of the lienor's claim shall not constitute a waiver of the lienor's lien, unless expressly so agreed in writing, nor shall it in any way affect the period for serving or recording the notice of lien under this chapter.

Any contract provision that purports to waive any right of lien under this chapter is void and unenforceable as against the public policy of this state.

If a prime contractor or remote contractor solicits any person to sign a contract requiring the person to waive a right of lien in violation of this section, then the person shall notify the state board for licensing contractors of that fact. Upon receiving the information, the executive director of the board shall notify the prime contractor or remote contractor within a reasonable time after receiving the information that the contract is against the public policy of this state and in violation of this section. If the prime contractor or remote contractor voluntarily deletes the waiver of lien provision from the contract and affirmatively states that the language will not be included in any future contracts to perform construction work in this state, then no further action shall be taken by the board against the prime contractor or remote contractor unless a later complaint is filed against the prime contractor or remote contractor for a violation of this section.

If the prime contractor or remote contractor does not delete the waiver of lien provision from the contract, then the executive director shall schedule a hearing for appropriate action by the board. If the board finds after a hearing that the contracts of the prime contractor or remote contractor are in violation of this section, then the board shall immediately revoke the prime contractor's or remote contractor's license.

The board shall send notice of the revocation to the prime contractor's or remote contractor's licensing authority in all states in which the prime contractor or remote contractor is licensed as a contractor.

In any action for damages based on the waiver of a right of lien filed by a person solicited by the prime contractor or remote contractor, the person has the right to recover from the prime contractor or remote contractor reasonable attorney's fees and costs in connection with the enforcement of the lien.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, no liens by remote contractors are allowed under this chapter if, prior to any work or labor being provided or materials, services, equipment, or machinery furnished in furtherance of the improvement, the owner, or the owner's agent, provides a payment bond, equal in amount to one hundred percent (100%) of the prime contractor's contract price, in favor of the remote contractors who provide work or labor or furnish materials, services, equipment, or machinery in furtherance of the improvement pursuant to a contract. The payment bond shall be executed with sufficient surety by one (1) or more sureties authorized to do business in this state. The bond shall be recorded in the office of the register of deeds of every county where the real property to be improved, or any affected part, lies.

Code 1932, § 7939; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1124; Acts 2005, ch. 197, § 1; 2007, ch. 189, § 23; 2009, ch. 483, § 1; 2020, ch. 749, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2005, ch. 197, § 2 provided that the amendment by the act shall be effective only for contracts issued on or after July 1, 2005.

Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “prime contractor or remote contractor” for "contractor" throughout (b)(2); in the last sentence of (b)(2)(A), added “for a violation of this section”; in (b)(2)(B), inserted “from the contract” in the first sentence, and in the second sentence, inserted “then the board shall immediately revoke the prime contractor's or remote” and deleted "shall be immediately revoked” from the end; and in (b)(2)(C), added “The board shall send” and deleted “shall be sent by the board” following “revocation”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.

Law Reviews.

Mechanics' and Materialmen's Liens in Tennessee (Charles H. Barnett), 5 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 359 (1975).

Attorney General Opinions. The 2005 amendment to T.C.A. §66-11-124 cannot to prohibit any and all lien waivers, OAG 05-184, 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 186 (12/22/05).

Collateral References.

Release or waiver of mechanic's lien by general contractor as affecting rights of subcontractor or materialman. 75 A.L.R.3d 505.

66-11-125. Maintaining an action on a contract not precluded.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent any lienor under any contract from maintaining an action on the contract as if the lienor had no lien for the security of the lienor's debt, and the bringing of the action shall not prejudice the lienor's rights under this chapter.

Code 1932, § 7940; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1125; Acts 2007, ch. 189, § 24.

66-11-126. Methods of enforcement.

Liens under this chapter, except as provided in subdivision (5)(A), shall be enforced only by the filing of a complaint, petition, or civil warrant seeking the issuance of an attachment in the manner as follows:

For a prime contractor, the lien shall be enforced in a court of law or equity by complaint and writ of attachment or in a court of general sessions having jurisdiction by a warrant for the sum claimed and writ of attachment, filed under oath, setting forth the facts, describing the real property, with process to be served on the person or persons whose interests the prime contractor seeks to attach and sell;

For a remote contractor, the lien shall be enforced in a court of law or equity by complaint and writ of attachment or in a court of general sessions having jurisdiction by a warrant for the sum claimed and writ of attachment, filed under oath, setting forth the facts and describing the real property with process to be served on the person or persons whose interests the remote contractor seeks to attach and sell. In the discretion of the plaintiff or complainant, the complaint or warrant may also be served on the prime contractor or remote contractor in any degree, with whom the plaintiff or complainant is in contractual privity. In either event, the person or persons whose interest the remote contractor seeks to attach and sell shall have the right to make the prime contractor or remote contractor a defendant by third-party complaint or cross-claim as is otherwise provided by law;

A complaint, petition, or civil warrant under this chapter is timely filed if a suit seeking the issuance of an attachment is filed within the applicable period of time, even if the attachment is not issued or served within the applicable period. The clerk of the court in which the suit is brought shall issue the attachment writ without obtaining fiat of a judge or chancellor;

The clerk of the court to whom application for attachment is made shall, before issuing the attachment, require the plaintiff, or the plaintiff's agent or attorney to execute a bond with sufficient surety, payable to the defendant or defendants in the amount of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or the amount of the lien claimed, whichever is less; provided, that a party may petition the court for an increase in the amount for good cause shown, and conditioned that the plaintiff will prosecute the attachment with effect or, in case of failure, pay the defendant or defendants all costs that may be adjudged against the defendant or defendants and all such damages as the defendant or defendants may sustain by the wrongful suing out of the attachment; and

Where a bond has been provided pursuant to § 66-11-124, § 66-11-136, or § 66-11-142, an attachment on the real property shall not be necessary after the bond has been recorded, and the claim shall be enforced by a complaint, petition, or civil warrant on the bond before the circuit or chancery court, or before a court of general sessions where the amount is within its jurisdiction, filed under oath, setting forth the facts and describing the real property with process to be served on the obligors on the bond. In the discretion of the plaintiff or complainant, the complaint or warrant may also be served on the owner or owner's agent, prime contractor or remote contractor in any degree with whom the plaintiff is in contractual privity. In either event, the obligors on the bond shall have the right to make the owner or owner's agent, prime contractor, or any remote contractor of any degree a defendant by third-party complaint or cross-claim as is otherwise provided by law. Any complaint, petition, or civil warrant on the bond shall be filed in the county where any portion of the real property is located;

Where a lien is enforced pursuant to this subdivision (5), or after suit is commenced on a bond provided pursuant to § 66-11-124, § 66-11-136, or § 66-11-142, the plaintiff shall, in case of failure to prosecute the suit with effect, pay the defendant or defendants all costs adjudged against the defendant or defendants and all the damages the defendant or defendants may sustain by the wrongful assertion of the lien; and

Where a complaint, petition, or civil warrant is brought pursuant to this subdivision (5), or after suit is commenced on a bond provided pursuant to § 66-11-124, § 66-11-136, or § 66-11-142, the defendants shall retain all defenses to the validity of the underlying lien.

Code 1932, § 7948; Acts 1957, ch. 235, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1126; Acts 2007, ch. 189, § 25; 2014, ch. 557, § 1; 2015, ch. 117, § 1; 2020, ch. 749, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014 ch. 557, § 2, provided that the act shall apply to any lien based on work or labor that is performed on or after July 1, 2014.

Acts 2015, ch. 117, § 3 provides that the act shall apply to any lien that attaches on or after April 10, 2015.

Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment rewrote (1) and (2), which read: “(1) For a prime contractor, the lien shall be enforced in a court of law or equity by attachment or in a court of general sessions having jurisdiction by a warrant for the sum claimed and writ of attachment, filed under oath, setting forth the facts, describing the real property, to be served on the persons whose interests the prime contractor seeks to attach and sell under process, and the owner or owners as defined in §66-11-101 shall be given notice only of the filing of such warrant and writ of attachment;”“(2) For a remote contractor, the lien shall be enforced in a court of law or equity by attachment or in a court of general sessions having jurisdiction by a warrant for the sum claimed and writ of attachment, filed under oath, setting forth the facts, describing the real property, to be served on the persons whose interests the remote contractor seeks to attach and sell under process, and the owner or owners as defined in §66-11-101 shall be given notice only of the filing of such warrant and writ of attachment. Within the discretion of the plaintiff or complainant, the warrant and writ of attachment may be served on the prime contractor, or remote contractor in any degree, with whom the plaintiff or complainant is in contractual privity, but the owner or owners shall have the right to make the prime contractor or remote contractor a defendant by third-party complaint or cross-claim as is otherwise provided by law;”; in (4) added “or” preceding “the plaintiff’s agent” in the first sentence; and rewrote (5)(A), which read: “ (5)(A) Where a bond has been provided pursuant to §66-11-124, §66-11-136, or §66-11-142, an attachment on the real property shall not be necessary after the bond has been recorded, and the lien shall be enforced by an action on the bond before the circuit or chancery court, or before a court of general sessions where the amount is within its jurisdiction, filed under oath, setting forth the facts and describing the real property. Any such action shall be served on the principal of the bond and may, in the discretion of the plaintiff, be served on the owner or owner's agent, prime contractor, the remote contractor in any degree with whom the plaintiff is in contractual relation, and the surety on the bond, but the prime contractor, any remote contractor of any degree or the surety on the bond shall have the right to make others a defendant by third-party complaint or cross-claim as is otherwise provided by law.”

The 2020 amendment substituted “a complaint, petition, or civil warrant” for “an action” throughout the section; and substituted “Any complaint, petition, or civil warrant” for “Any action” in (5)(A).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 117, § 3. April 10, 2015.

Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.

Cross-References. Attachment, title 29, ch. 6.

Enforcement in general sessions court, §66-11-134.

Vendor's liens, title 66, ch. 10.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Attachment and Garnishment, §§ 131, 134; 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, § 18; 18 Tenn. Juris., Mechanics' Liens, §§ 2, 3, 10, 20, 22; 20 Tenn. Juris., Parties, § 3.

Law Reviews.

Priority Conflicts Between Fixture Secured Creditors and Real Estate Claimants (Coburn Dewees Berry), 7 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 209 (1977).

66-11-127. Suits against personal representatives.

The provision of title 30, chapter 2, part 5, prohibiting the bringing of suits against personal representatives after the grant of letters shall not apply to suits brought under this chapter.

Code 1932, § 7946; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1127; Acts 2007, ch. 189, § 26.

Cross-References. “Code” defined, §1-3-105.

Prohibition of suits against personal representatives, §30-2-501.

66-11-128. Enforcement against persons adjudicated incompetent.

If the labor, improvements, materials, services, equipment, or machinery are furnished for work done on the lands of any infant, person adjudicated incompetent, or cestui que trust, and in excusable ignorance on the part of the prime contractors or remote contractors, of the person's lack of legal capacity, the prime contractors or remote contractors shall have the right, after serving ten (10) days' notice on any guardian, conservator or trustee of the person, within which period satisfaction may be made, to take and remove the parts of the property on which their labor was performed, or their materials, services, equipment, or machinery or other property was used, the removal to be only of enough to satisfy their true claim and to be without substantial injury to the property of the person as it stood prior to improvement.

As an alternative to the remedy under subsection (a), the court, in the enforcement of a lien provided by this chapter, may order the improvement to be separately sold and the purchaser may remove the improvement within such reasonable time as the court may fix. The purchase price for the improvement shall be paid into court. The owner of the land upon which the improvement was made may demand that the land be restored to substantially its condition before the improvement was commenced, in which case the court shall order its restoration, and the reasonable charge for the restoration shall be first paid out of the purchase price and the balance shall be paid to lienors and other encumbrancers in accordance with their respective rights.

Acts 1889, ch. 103, § 2; Shan., § 3533; mod. Code 1932, § 7920; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1128; Acts 2007, ch. 189, § 27; 2011, ch. 47, § 71.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 107 provided that nothing in the legislation shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of this legislation, which was July 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 108 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mechanics' Liens, § 28.

66-11-129. Right of removal from lands of persons under disability.

The right of removal provided in §66-11-128 shall apply on like terms and in like manner as in other cases of superior titles or liens, when the work was done by the prime contractor or remote contractor in excusable ignorance of the rights of such persons.

Acts 1899, ch. 103, § 2; Shan., § 3534; mod. Code 1932, § 7921; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1129; Acts 2007, ch. 189, § 28.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mechanics' Liens, § 28.

66-11-130. Demand for enforcement of lien.

Upon written demand of the owner, the owner's agent, or prime contractor, served on the lienor, requiring the lienor to file a complaint, petition, or civil warrant to enforce the lienor's lien, and describing the real property in the demand, the proceeding must be commenced, or the claim filed in a creditors' or foreclosure proceeding, within sixty (60) days after service, or the lien is forfeited.

Code 1932, § 7947; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1130; Acts 2007, ch. 189, § 29; 2020, ch. 749, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “file a complaint, petition, or civil warrant” for “commence action” and “proceeding must” for “action shall”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 8-706.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mechanics' Liens, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Mechanics' and Materialmen's Liens, 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 741 (1978).

66-11-131. Joinder of petitioners.

Where there are several persons entitled to the lien given by this chapter, all or any number of them may join in one (1) suit; or upon the filing by one (1) or more of the lienors of a complaint, petition, or civil warrant for the benefit of all lienors, any other lienor may come in by petition, under oath, without suing out a new attachment, by giving bond and security, with effect as if the attachment, if any, had been taken out by the petitioner.

Code 1858, § 3544; Shan., § 5307; mod. Code 1932, § 7949; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1131; Acts 2007, ch. 189, § 30; 2020, ch. 749, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “a complaint, petition, or civil warrant” for “an action”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.

Cross-References. Intervention, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 24.

Permissive joinder of parties, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 20.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 465, 466.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mechanics' Liens, § 20; 20 Tenn. Juris., Parties, § 6.

66-11-132. Consolidation of proceedings.

If separate complaints, petitions, or civil warrants to enforce liens provided by this chapter are brought in the same court, then they must be consolidated; and if in different courts, the proceedings may, upon application, be removed into the court, if a court of record, in which the first complaint, petition, or civil warrant was filed, and there consolidated, unless the later proceeding is one for the benefit of all lienors, in the nature of a lien-creditors' bill, in which event earlier proceedings not of that nature must be consolidated into the lien-creditors' bill, on petition.

Code 1858, § 3546; Shan., § 5309; mod. Code 1932, § 7950; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1132; Acts 2007, ch. 189, § 31; 2020, ch. 749, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “complaints, petitions, or civil warrants” for “actions”, substituted “proceedings” for “actions” twice, and substituted “complaint, petition, or civil warrant” for “action” and “proceeding” for “action”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.

Cross-References. Consolidation, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 42.

Law Reviews.

Trial, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 335 (1973).

66-11-133. Adjudication of conflicting rights in consolidated proceeding.

The court is authorized to adjudicate, in a consolidated proceeding, the conflicting rights of the parties claiming liens, among themselves; and to enforce the same according to priorities, if any.

Code 1858, § 3545; Shan., § 5308; mod. Code 1932, § 7951; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1133; Acts 2007, ch. 189, § 32; 2020, ch. 749, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “consolidated proceeding” for “consolidated action”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.

66-11-134. Enforcement in general sessions court.

When the lien is enforced by a civil warrant before a court of general sessions, and when an attachment has been levied on the lot or land and judgment rendered, the papers shall be returned to the circuit court, there to be proceeded with as in the case of a court of general sessions execution levied on land.

No court of general sessions' attachment in any such case shall be a lien on the land, unless, within twenty (20) days after the levy of attachment, an abstract of the levy of attachment, showing the name of the plaintiff and defendant, the date and amount of the claim, and a description of the premises affected, is filed for registration in the lien book in the office of the register of the county in which the real property, or any affected portion of the real property, lies.

The register shall index the abstract, as the indexer is required to index deeds, and, for the registration and indexing, the indexer shall receive the sum prescribed by § 8-21-1001.

Code 1858, §§ 3547-3549 (deriv. Acts 1857-1858, ch. 62, §§ 1, 2); Shan., §§ 5310-5312; mod. Code 1932, §§ 7952-7954; modified; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 64-1134 — 64-1136; Acts 2007, ch. 189, § 33; 2020, ch. 749, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “enforced by a civil warrant” for “enforced by an action” in (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.

Cross-References. Methods of enforcement, §66-11-126.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, § 18; 18 Tenn. Juris., Mechanics' Liens, § 21.

66-11-135. Release of lien — Recording release.

If a lienor whose lien has been forfeited, expired, satisfied or adjudged against the lienor in a proceeding on the lien, fails to cause the lien provided by this chapter to be released within thirty (30) days after service of written notice demanding release, the lienor shall be liable to the owner for all damages arising therefrom, and costs, including reasonable attorneys' fees, incurred by the owner.

The release shall be recorded in the office where the notice of lien was recorded. The fee for recording shall be the fee required for the recording of a release or satisfaction of a mortgage as provided by law.

For the purpose of this section, a lien shall be deemed released on the day on which the release of the lien is recorded in the proper office.

Code 1932, § 7935; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1137; Acts 2007, ch. 189, § 34; 2020, ch. 749, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “a proceeding” for “an action” in (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.

Cross-References. Form and contents of lien book, §66-21-103.

Collateral References.

Release or waiver of mechanic's lien by general contractor as affecting rights of subcontractor or materialman. 75 A.L.R.3d 505.

66-11-136. Property owner's right to bond against enforcement of liens.

The owner of the property on which the improvement is made has the right to demand a bond from the prime contractor to protect the owner in case of the enforcement of a lien under this chapter by one (1) or more remote contractors; and in the event the prime contractor is paid for the work done, or any part of it, that is subject to a lien by a remote contractor, then on payment by the owner to the remote contractor of the amount due, the owner shall have judgment for the amount by filing a complaint, petition, or civil warrant against the bond in any court having jurisdiction in such cases; but the prime contractor shall have the right to contest the legality and amount of the claim of the remote contractors before the prime contractor is held liable.

Acts 1889, ch. 103, § 3; Shan., § 3542; mod. Code 1932, § 7932; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1138; Acts 2007, ch. 189, § 35; 2020, ch. 749, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “by filing a complaint, petition, or civil warrant against the bond” for “by action on the bond”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.

Cross-References. General home repairs and improvement contractors, title 7, ch. 62, part 2.

Surety bonds on public contracts, title 12, ch. 4, part 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 8-702.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mechanics' Liens, §§ 2, 10, 12, 29; 26 Tenn. Juris., Working Contracts, § 14.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1986, 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 457 (1987).

66-11-137. Owner's misapplication of loan proceeds — Violation.

Any owner who procures a loan secured by a mortgage or other encumbrance on certain real property, representing that the proceeds of the loan are to be used for the purpose of improving real property, and who, with intent to defraud, uses the proceeds or any part of the proceeds for any other purpose than to pay for labor performed on, or materials, services, equipment, or machinery furnished for the real property, and overhead and profit related thereto while any amount for the labor, materials, services, equipment, machinery, overhead or profit remains unpaid, or while any amount of which the owner has received notice of nonpayment prescribed by this chapter remains unpaid, shall be liable to an injured party for any damages and actual expenses incurred, including attorneys' fees, if the damages and expenses incurred are the result of the misapplication of the loan proceeds.

A violation of subsection (a) is a Class E felony.

Code 1932, § 7943; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1139; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 88; 2007, ch. 189, § 36.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class E felony, §40-35-111.

Theft offenses, title 39, ch. 14, part 1.

66-11-138. Contractor's misapplication of payments — Violation.

Any prime contractor or remote contractor who, with intent to defraud, uses the proceeds of any payment made to that contractor on account of improving certain real property for any purpose other than to pay for labor performed on, or materials, services, equipment, or machinery furnished by that contractor's order for the real property, and overhead and profit related thereto, while any amount for the labor, materials, services, equipment, machinery, overhead, or profit remains unpaid shall be liable to an injured party for any damages and actual expenses incurred, including attorneys' fees, if the damages and expenses incurred are the result of the misapplication of the payment.

A violation of subdivision (a)(1) is a Class E felony.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), there is no violation of this section when:

Funds are disbursed pursuant to written agreement; or

The use of funds received and deposited in a business account for use on multiple construction projects is based on the allocation of costs and profits in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles for construction projects.

Code 1932, § 7944 (Williams, § 7944a); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1140; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 89; 2004, ch. 688, § 1; 2007, ch. 189, § 37.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class E felony, §40-35-111.

Theft offenses, title 39, ch. 14, part 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Bankruptcy, §§ 9, 41; 6 Tenn. Juris., Constitutional Law, § 47; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, § 66; 18 Tenn. Juris., Mechanics' Liens, §§ 3, 19.

Law Reviews.

Security Transaction — Right of Principal Debtor to Control Application of Payment, 24 Tenn. L. Rev. 901 (1957).

66-11-139. Exaggeration of claims by lienor.

If, in any proceeding to enforce the lien provided by this chapter, the court finds that any lienor has willfully and grossly exaggerated the amount for which that person claims a lien, as stated in that person's notice of lien or pleading filed, in the discretion of the court, no recovery may be allowed thereon, and the lienor may be liable for any actual expenses incurred by the injured party, including attorneys' fees, as a result of the lienor's exaggeration.

Code 1932, § 7944; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1141; Acts 2007, ch. 189, § 38; 2020, ch. 749, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “in any proceeding to enforce” for “in any action to enforce”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mechanics' Liens, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Mechanics' and Materialmen's Liens, 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 741 (1978).

66-11-140. Misuse of proceeds prima facie evidence of intent to defraud.

Use of the proceeds as enumerated in §§66-11-137 —66-11-139 for any purpose other than either payment pursuant to written agreement between the parties or in accordance with the allocation of costs and profits under generally accepted accounting principles for construction projects shall be prima facie evidence of intent to defraud. Use of a single business bank account for multiple projects shall not be evidence of intent to defraud.

Code 1932, § 7945; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1142; Acts 2004, ch. 688, § 2; 2007, ch. 189, § 39.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Bankruptcy, § 9, 41; 6 Tenn. Juris., Constitutional Law, § 47; 18 Tenn. Juris., Mechanics' Liens, § 3.

Law Reviews.

1985 Tennessee Survey: Selected Developments in Tennessee Law, 53 Tenn. L. Rev. 389 (1986).

66-11-141. Well-drilling lien.

There is created a lien against the tract of land, on which any person, firm or corporation has drilled a well by contract with the owners of the land or their duly authorized agent, for all labor, materials and equipment used or furnished by the driller of the well, including any pump, apparatus or other fixtures attached to the well, installed by the driller.

The lien shall remain against the land for a period of two (2) years after the completion of the well or after the furnishing of any pump or apparatus attached to the well, unless sooner discharged by full payment.

The lien may be enforced by attachment of the land in a proceeding brought in any court of competent jurisdiction prior to the expiration of the lien, and the land may be sold in satisfaction of the unpaid indebtedness owing to the driller.

The rights of the lienor under this section shall be subject to the terms of § 66-11-112.

Acts 1949, ch. 267, §§ 1-3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 8028.1 (Williams, §§ 7959.1-7959.3); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1143; Acts 2007, ch. 189, § 40.

Law Reviews.

Survey of Tennessee Property Law, VII. Registration of Instruments (Toxey H. Sewell), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 160, 193 (1978).

Collateral References.

Assertion of statutory mechanics' or materialmen's lien against oil and gas produced or against proceeds attributable to oil and gas sold. 59 A.L.R.3d 278.

Casings of oil and gas well as subject to mechanic's lien. 39 A.L.R. 1260.

Lien for digging well. 55 A.L.R. 1562, 109 A.L.R. 395.

Oil and gas, right or interest subject to statutory lien for labor or material in developing property for. 122 A.L.R. 1182.

Wells as within Mechanics' Lien Law descriptive of improvement. 92 A.L.R. 753.

66-11-142. Bond to indemnify against recorded lien — Recording bond — Recording of contractor's payment bond.

If a lien, other than a lien granted in a written contract, is fixed or is attempted to be fixed by a recorded instrument under this chapter, any person may record a bond to indemnify against the lien. The bond shall be recorded with the register of deeds of the county in which the lien was recorded. The bond shall be for the amount of the lien claimed and with sufficient corporate surety authorized and admitted to do business in the state and licensed by the state to execute bonds as surety, and the bond shall be conditioned upon the obligor or obligors on the bond satisfying any judgment that may be rendered in favor of the person asserting the lien. The bond shall state the book and page or other reference and the office where the lien is of record. The recording by the register of a bond to indemnify against a lien shall operate as a discharge of the lien. After recording the bond, the register shall return the original bond to the person providing the bond. The register shall index the recording of the bond to indemnify against the lien in the same manner as a release of lien. The person asserting the lien may make the obligors on the bond parties to any proceeding in which the person files a complaint, petition, or civil warrant to enforce the claim, and any judgment recovered may be against all or any of the obligors on the bond.

When a prime contractor or remote contractor has provided a valid payment bond for the benefit of potential lien claimants, a copy of that bond may be recorded, in lieu of the recording of another bond, to discharge a lien asserted by the lien claimants. A copy of the bond may be recorded with the register of deeds in lieu of the bond provided in subsection (a) to discharge such a lien. Upon recording with the register of deeds, the prime contractor, remote contractor, or owner shall notify the surety executing the bond, and the lien on the property shall be discharged. The person asserting the lien may make the obligors on the bond parties to any proceeding in which the person files a complaint, petition, or civil warrant to enforce the claim, and any judgment recovered may be against all or any of the obligors on the bond.

The bond recorded pursuant to this subsection (b) shall:

Be in a penal sum at least equal to the total of the original contract amount;

Be in favor of the owner;

Be executed by:

The original prime contractor or remote contractor as principal; and

A sufficient corporate surety authorized and admitted to do business in this state and licensed by this state to execute bonds as surety; and

Provide for payment of the lien claimant, whether the lien claimant was employed or contracted with by the person who originally contracted with the owner of the premises or by a remote contractor.

The register of deeds may record any bond recorded under this section and return the original to the person providing the bond.

Acts 1974, ch. 580, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1144; Acts 1990, ch. 854, § 7; 1994, ch. 664, § 1; 1995, ch. 30, §§ 4-6; 2007, ch. 189, § 41; 2015, ch. 117, § 2; 2020, ch. 749, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 117, § 3 provided that the act shall apply to any lien that attaches on or after April 10, 2015.

Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment, in (b), deleted “at the contractor’s option” following “A copy of the bond may” and added the last sentence in (1); deleted former (2)(C), which read: “have the written approval of the owner endorsed on it”; redesignated former (2)(D) and (E) as (2)(C) and (D) and deleted former (2)(F), which read: “Provide for payment for extras, as defined in §66-11-101, not exceeding fifteen percent (15%) of the prime contractor's contract price, if and to the extent the lien claimant is claiming extras.”

The 2020 amendment substituted “parties to any proceeding in which the person files a complaint, petition, or civil warrant” for “parties to any action” in the last sentence of (a) and (b)(1); in the third sentence of (b)(1), substituted “the prime contractor, remote contractor, or owner shall notify” and inserted “prime contractor or remote” in (b)(2)(C)(i).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 117, § 3. April 10, 2015.

Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.

Law Reviews.

Attorney vs. Client: Lien Rights and Remedies in Tennessee (Margret H. Tucker), 7 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 435 (1977).